Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.175

School data—Collection and submission to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(1) No later than the beginning of the 2008-09 school year and thereafter, each school district shall collect and electronically submit to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in a format and according to a schedule prescribed by the office, the following data for each class or course offered in each school:

(a) The certification number or other unique identifier associated with the teacher's certificate for each teacher assigned to teach the class or course, including reassignments that may occur during the school year; and

(b) The statewide student identifier for each student enrolled in or being provided services through the class or course.

(2) No later than the beginning of the 2014-15 school year, the data under subsection (1) of this section must also include dates of teacher assignments and reassignments.

[ 2014 c 161 s 1; 2007 c 401 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2007 c 401: See note following RCW 28A.300.500.